test/src/morphology/V-mainsted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mainsted: # Verb 'to tell' - full paradigm
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainstam
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mainstak
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mainast
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mainstep
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mainsteˊped
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+4: mainstet

     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mainstem
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mainstiǩ
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mainsti
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mainstim
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mainstid
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+4: mainsteš

     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg1: mainsteˊžem
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg2: mainsteˊžiǩ
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg3: mainstež
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl1: mainsteˊžep
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl2: mainsteˊžid
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl3: mainsteˊže
     mainsted+V+Pot+4: [mainsteˊžet, maainsteˊžet]
     mainsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [mainsteˊže, maainsteˊže]

     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg1: [mainsteˊčem, maainsteˊčem]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg2: [mainsteˊčiǩ, maainsteˊčiǩ]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg3: [mainsteˊči, maainsteˊči]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [mainsteˊčim, maainsteˊčim, mainsteˊčep, maainsteˊčep]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl2: [mainsteˊčid, maainsteˊčid]
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl3: [mainsteˊče, maainsteˊče]
     mainsted+V+Cond+4: [mainsteˊčeš, maainsteˊčeš]

     mainsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [mainsteˊče, maainsteˊče]

     mainsted+V+Imp+Sg2: maainâst
     mainsted+V+Imp+Sg3: [mainstââǥǥas, maainstââǥǥas]
     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl1: [mainstâkap, maainstâkap]
     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl2: [mainsteˊǩed, maainsteˊǩed]
     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl3: [mainstâkaz, maainstâkaz]
     mainsted+V+Imp+ConNeg: [mainstuku, maainstuku]
     mainsted+V+ActEss: [mainsteˊmen, maainsteˊmen]
     mainsted+V+Action: [mainstam, maainstam]
     mainsted+V+PrsPrc: [mainsteei, maainsteei]
     mainsted+V+PrfPrc: [mainstam, maainstam]
     mainsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [mainstummu, maainstummu, mainstuum, maainstuum]
     mainsted+V+VAbess: [mainsteǩâni, maainsteǩâni]

     mainsted+V+GerTemp: [mainsteen, maainsteen]
     mainsted+V+GerInstr: [mainsteeˊl, maainsteeˊl]




#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [mainstak, maainstak]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainast
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [mainstep, maainstep]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [mainsteˊped, maainsteˊped]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [mainste, maainste] 
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+4: [mainstet, maainstet]
#
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [mainstem, maainstem]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [mainstiǩ, maainstiǩ]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [mainsti, maainsti]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [mainstim, maainstim, mainstin, maainstin, mainstiim, maainstiim, mainstiin, maainstiin]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mainstid, maainstid, mainstiid, maainstiid]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mainste, maainste]
#     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+4: [mainsteš, maainsteš]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg1: [mainsteˊžem, maainsteˊžem]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg2: [mainsteˊžiǩ, maainsteˊžiǩ]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg3: [mainstež, maainsteˊž]
#
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl1: [mainsteˊžep, maainsteˊžep, mainsteˊžim, maainsteˊžim, mainsteˊžin, maainsteˊžin]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl2: [mainsteˊžid, maainsteˊžid]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl3: [mainsteˊže, maainsteˊže]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+4: [mainsteˊžet, maainsteˊžet]
#     mainsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: [mainsteˊže, maainsteˊže]
#
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg1: [mainsteˊčem, maainsteˊčem]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg2: [mainsteˊčiǩ, maainsteˊčiǩ]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg3: [mainsteˊči, maainsteˊči]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl1: [mainsteˊčim, maainsteˊčim, mainsteˊčep, maainsteˊčep]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl2: [mainsteˊčid, maainsteˊčid]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl3: [mainsteˊče, maainsteˊče]
#     mainsted+V+Cond+4: [mainsteˊčeš, maainsteˊčeš]
#
#     mainsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [mainsteˊče, maainsteˊče]
#
#     mainsted+V+Imp+Sg2: maainâst
#     mainsted+V+Imp+Sg3: [mainstââǥǥas, maainstââǥǥas]
#     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl1: [mainstâkap, maainstâkap]
#     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl2: [mainsteˊǩed, maainsteˊǩed]
#     mainsted+V+Imp+Pl3: [mainstâkaz, maainstâkaz]
#     mainsted+V+Imp+ConNeg: [mainstuku, maainstuku]
#     mainsted+V+ActEss: [mainsteˊmen, maainsteˊmen]
#     mainsted+V+Action: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+PrsPrc: [mainsteei, maainsteei]
#     mainsted+V+PrfPrc: [mainstam, maainstam]
#     mainsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [mainstummu, maainstummu, mainstuum, maainstuum]
#     mainsted+V+VAbess: [mainsteǩâni, maainsteǩâni]
#
#     mainsted+V+GerTemp: [mainsteen, maainsteen]
#     mainsted+V+GerInstr: [mainsteeˊl, maainsteeˊl]
